ja: 吊り下げ式アタッチメントの種類: チェーン; コード; 釣糸; フック; リボン; ストリング; 吸盤; ワイヤー; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta visečega pritrdilnega elementa: Verižica; Vrvica; Ribiška vrvica; Kavelj; Tračni; Niz; Prisesek; Žica; Druga
tr: Asma aparatı tipi: Zincir; Kordon; Misina; Kanca; Şerit; İp; Vantuzlu; Tel; Diğer
nl: Type ophangbevestiging: Ketting; Koord; Vislijn; Haak; Lint; Snaar; Zuignap; Draad; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja vješanja: Lančić; Uzica; Najlon za ribarenje; Kuka; Vrpca; Niz; Prianjaljka; Žičani; Ostalo
cs: Typ závěsného uchycení: Řetěz; Lanko; Rybářský vlasec; Hák; Stuha; Provázek; Přísavka; Drát; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de atașament suspendat: Lanț; Șnur; Fir de pescuit; Cârlig; Fâșie; Fir; Ventuză; Sârmă; Altele
nb: Type hengefeste: Kjede; Ledning; Fiskesnøre; Krok; Bånd; Snor; Sugekopp; Metalltråd; Annet
pl: Typ podwieszenia: Łańcuch; Sznur; Żyłka wędkarska; Hak; Wstążka; Linka; Przyssawka; Drut; Pozostałe
hu: Függő rögzítés típusa: Lánc; Zsinór; Damil; Horog; Szalag; Kötél; Tapadókorong; Huzal; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ závesného uchytenia: Reťaz; Šnúrka; Rybársky vlasec; Háčik; Stužka; Struna; Prísavka; Drôt; Iné
ko: 걸이 부착 유형: 체인; 코드; 낚싯줄; 후크; 리본; 끈; 석션 컵; 와이어; 기타
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์สำหรับแขวน: แหวนโซ่; Cord; สายเอ็นใส; ตะขอ; ริบบิ้น; สตริง; ยางดูด; ลวด; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di attacco di sospensione: Catena; Cavo; Lenza da pesca; Gancio; Nastro; Corda; Ventosa; Filo; Altro
de: Hängebefestigungstyp: Kette; Cord; Angelschnur; Haken; Schleife; String; Saugnapf; Draht; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Pakabinimo tvirtinimo tipas: Grandinėlė; Virvelė; Žvejybos linija; Su kabliuku; Juostinis; Styginis; Su siurbtuku; Viela; Kita
fr: Type de fixation suspendue: Chaîne; Corde; Fil de pêche; Crochet; À ruban; Ficelle; Ventouse; Fil de fer; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação suspensa: Corrente; Cordão; Linha de pesca; Gancho; Fita; Corda; Ventosa; Arame; Outro
zh-TW: 懸掛配件類型: 鏈條; 繩索; 釣魚線; 鉤子; 帶狀; 細繩; 吸盤; 線圈; 其他
ru: Тип подвесного крепления: Цепочка; Шнур; Рыболовная леска; Крючок; Лента; Нить; Присоска; Проволока; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação suspensa: Corrente; Cordão; Linha de pesca; Gancho; Fita; Corda; Copo de sucção; Fio; Outro
da: Ophængstype: Kæde; Snor; Fiskesnøre; Krog; Bånd; Streng; Sugekop; Tråd; Andet
bg-BG: Тип механизъм за окачване: Верига; Шнур; Риболовни влакна; Кука; Лентово; Връв; С вендуза; С тел; Друго
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος ανάρτησης: Αλυσίδα; Κορδόνι; Πετονιά; Άγκιστρο; Κορδέλα; Σκοινί; Βεντούζα; Δέσιμο με σύρμα; Άλλο
vi: Loại móc treo: Xích; Dây; Dây câu; Móc; Ruy-băng; Chuỗi; Giác hút; Dây điện; Khác
zh-CN: 悬挂安装类型: 链条; 绳索; 钓鱼线; 钩式; 丝带; 细绳; 吸盘; 金属丝; 其他
fi: Ripustettavan kiinnityksen tyyppi: Ketju; Punosnauha; Siima; Koukku; Nauha; Nyöri; Imukuppi; Lanka; Muu
es: Tipo de fijación para colgar: Cadena; Cordón; Sedal; Gancho; Cinta; Cordón; Ventosa; Alambre; Otros
sv: Typ av upphängningsfäste: Kedja; Kedja; Fiskelina; Krok; Band; Sträng; Sugkopp; Tråd; Övrigt
en: Hanging attachment type: Chain; Cord; Fishing line; Hook; Ribbon; String; Suction cup; Wire; Other